Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
In General

§ 7-5-1.
Qualifications, election, and duties.

The Attorney General provided for by Section 173 of the Mississippi Constitution shall be elected at the same time and in the same manner as the Governor is elected. His term of office shall be four (4) years and his compensation shall be fixed by the Legislature. He shall be the chief legal officer and advisor for the state, both civil and criminal, and is charged with managing all litigation on behalf of the state, except as otherwise specifically provided by law. No arm or agency of the state government shall bring or defend a suit against another arm or agency without prior written approval of the Attorney General. He shall have the powers of the Attorney General at common law and, except as otherwise provided by law, is given the sole power to bring or defend a lawsuit on behalf of a state agency, the subject matter of which is of statewide interest. He shall intervene and argue the constitutionality of any statute when notified of a challenge thereto, pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure. His qualifications for office shall be as provided for chancery and circuit judges in Section 154 of the Mississippi Constitution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3655; 1942, § 3826; Laws, 1930, ch. 154; Laws, 1970, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-5-3.
Deputy attorney general.

There shall be no more than two (2) deputy attorneys general whose qualifications shall be the same as that of the Attorney General, who shall be appointed by the Attorney General to serve at his will and pleasure and whose compensation shall be fixed by the Legislature. The Attorney General may, in writing filed with the office of the Secretary of State, designate the deputy attorneys general to perform any duties and powers conferred on the Attorney General and to serve in his place and stead on any nonconstitutional board or commission for a particular meeting or series of called or regular meetings; and on such boards or commissions the deputy attorney general’s vote, decision or signature thereon shall have the full force and effect and shall be legal and binding on the State of Mississippi as if the Attorney General had personally participated in such meeting or meetings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3655; 1942, § 3826; Laws, 1930, ch. 154; Laws, 1970, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 347, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 7-5-5.
Assistants to the attorney general.

The Attorney General shall appoint nine (9) competent attorneys, each of whom shall be designated as an assistant attorney general. The assistants shall each possess all of the qualifications required by law of the Attorney General and shall have power and authority under the direction and supervision of the Attorney General to perform all of the duties required by law of that officer; and each shall be liable to the pains and penalties to which the Attorney General is liable. The assistants shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Attorney General, and they shall devote their entire time and attention to the duties pertaining to the department of justice as required by the general laws. The compensation of all assistants authorized by law shall be fixed by the Attorney General not to exceed the compensation fixed by law.

The Attorney General shall designate three (3) of the assistant attorneys general authorized under subsection (1) of this section to devote their time and attention primarily to defending and aiding in the defense in all courts of any suit, filed or threatened, against the State of Mississippi, against any subdivision thereof, or against any agency or instrumentality of the state or subdivision, including all elected officials and any other officer or employee thereof. When the circumstances permit, the assistants may perform any of the Attorney General’s powers and duties, including, but not limited to, engaging in lawsuits outside the state when in his opinion this would help bring about the equal application of federal laws and court decisions in every state and guaranteeing equal protection of the laws as guaranteed every citizen by the United States Constitution.

The Attorney General may employ outside counsel as special assistant attorneys general on a fee or contract basis; the Attorney General shall be the sole judge of the compensation in such cases except as otherwise provided in Section 7-5-8.

Any contract for services of outside counsel shall require current and complete written time and expense records that describe in detail the time, in increments of no greater than one tenth (1/10) of an hour, and money spent each day in performance of the contract.

On conclusion of the matter for which the outside legal services were obtained, outside counsel shall provide a complete written statement of all fees and expenses, and the final complete time and expense records.

The Attorney General may discharge any assistant attorney general or special assistant attorney general at his pleasure and appoint another in his stead. The assistant attorneys general shall devote their entire time and attention to the duties pertaining to the Department of Justice under the control and supervision of the Attorney General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 183; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3471; 1930, § 3656; 1942, §§ 3827, 3827-01, 3827-04; Laws, 1902, ch. 58; Laws, 1929, ch. 15; Laws, 1930, ch. 154; Laws, 1956, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 270; Laws, 1962, ch. 487, §§ 1, 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 348, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-5-7.
Outside counsel and special investigators.

The Governor may engage outside counsel on a noncontingent fee basis to assist the Attorney General in cases to which the state is a party when, in his opinion, the interest of the state requires it, subject to the action of the Legislature in providing compensation for such services not to exceed recognized bar rates for similar services.

The Attorney General is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint and employ outside counsel, on a fee or salary basis not to exceed recognized bar rates for similar services, to assist the Attorney General in the preparation for, prosecution, or defense of any litigation in the state or federal courts or before any federal commission or agency in which the state is a party or has an interest. The Attorney General may designate the outside counsel as special assistant Attorney General.

If the compensation agreed upon will be governed by a contingency fee contract, that contract must conform with the requirements of Section 7-5-8.

The Attorney General may also employ special investigators on a per diem or salary basis, to be agreed upon at the time of employment, for the purpose of interviewing witnesses, ascertaining facts, or rendering any other services that may be needed by the Attorney General in the preparation for and prosecution of suits by or against the State of Mississippi, or in suits in which the Attorney General is participating on account of same being of statewide interest.

The Attorney General may pay travel and other expenses of employees and appointees under this chapter in the same manner and amount as authorized by law for the payment of travel and expenses of state employees and officials.

The compensation of appointees and employees under this chapter shall be paid out of the Attorney General’s contingent fund, or out of any other funds appropriated to the Attorney General’s office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2643; 1892, § 2166; 1906, § 2382; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4774; 1930, § 3677; Laws, 1942, §§ 3829.5, 3848; Laws, 1958, ch. 290, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-5-8.
Congtingent fee contracts with outside counsel.

Before entering into a contingency fee contract with outside counsel, the state, an arm or agency of the state, or a statewide elected officer acting in his official capacity must first make a written determination that contingency fee representation is both cost-effective and in the public interest. The required written determination shall include specific findings for each of the following factors:

Whether there exist sufficient and appropriate legal and financial resources within the Attorney General’s office to handle the matter.

The time and labor required; the novelty, complexity, and difficulty of the questions involved; and the skill requisite to perform the attorney services properly.

The geographic area where the attorney services are to be provided.

The amount of experience desired for the particular kind of attorney services to be provided and the nature of the outside attorney’s experience with similar issues or cases.

The state, an arm or agency of the state, or a statewide elected officer acting in his official capacity may not enter into a contingency fee contract that provides for the outside attorney to receive a contingency fee, exclusive of reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the case, which is in excess of the following:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of any recovery of up to Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00); plus

Twenty percent (20%) of any portion of such recovery between Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) and Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00); plus

Fifteen percent (15%) of any portion of such recovery between Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) and Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00); plus

Ten percent (10%) of any portion of such recovery between Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) and Twenty-five Million Dollars (25,000,000.00); plus

Five percent (5%) of any portion of such recovery exceeding Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00).

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a contingency fee shall not exceed an aggregate of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00), exclusive of reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the case, and irrespective of the number of lawsuits filed or the number of attorneys retained to achieve the recovery.

A contingency fee shall not be based on penalties or civil fines awarded or any amounts attributable to penalties or civil fines.

The limits on fees set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply if:

The state, an arm or agency of the state, or a statewide elected officer acting in his official capacity makes a written determination stating the reasons why a greater fee is necessary, proper, and in the best interests of the state in a particular case; and

The Outside Counsel Oversight Commission approves any terms of the contingency contract that exceed the limits set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

The Outside Counsel Oversight Commission shall consist of the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Secretary of State; actions of the commission shall be taken by majority vote. Appeal from a decision of the Outside Counsel Oversight Commission shall be to any court of competent jurisdiction.

Copies of any executed contingency fee contract and the applicable written determination to enter into a contingency fee contract with the outside attorney shall be posted on the Attorney General’s website for public inspection within five (5) business days after the date the contract is executed unless the state, arm or agency of the state, or statewide elected officer retaining outside counsel makes a determination, subject to the approval of the Outside Counsel Oversight Commission, that to do so would negatively affect the state’s interest, and shall remain posted on the website for the duration of the contingency fee contract, including any extensions or amendments to the contract.

If the determination is made and duly approved that posting the contract will negatively affect the interests of the state, the contract will be posted on the Attorney General’s website within five (5) days of the occurrence of the earliest of the following:

Filing of the lawsuit for which the contract was executed;

Entry of appearance for any pending matter for which the contract was executed; or

From the time the outside attorney engages in any substantive action on behalf of the state relative to the subject matter for which the contract was executed.

Any payment of contingency fees shall be posted on the Attorney General’s website within fifteen (15) days after the payment of the contingency fees to the outside attorney and shall remain posted on the website for at least one (1) year after the date payment is made.

An outside attorney under contract to provide services to the state on a contingency fee basis shall, from the inception of the contract until not less than four (4) years after the contract expires or is terminated, maintain detailed current records, including documentation of all expenses, disbursements, charges, credits, underlying receipts and invoices, and other financial transactions that concern the providing of attorney services. In addition, the outside attorney shall maintain detailed contemporaneous time records for the attorneys and paralegals working on the matter in increments of no greater than one-tenth (1/10) of an hour, and shall promptly provide these records to the Attorney General upon request.

If an arm or agency of the state or a statewide elected officer contracts for outside legal counsel pursuant to Section 7-5-39(3) on a contingency fee basis, the arm or agency of the state or the statewide elected officer shall provide complete and timely information to the Office of the Attorney General as to every requirement of this section for inclusion in the report under this section. The Office of the Attorney General shall post the information as received on its website within five (5) days of receipt.

The arm or agency of the state or statewide elected official responsible for retaining outside counsel shall provide complete and timely information to the Office of the Attorney General as to every requirement of Section 7-5-21 for inclusion in the docket required by that section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-5-9.
Additional employees.

The attorney general shall have the power to employ a suitable and competent person or persons who possess professional skill and/or expert knowledge when such employment shall be necessary in order to enable him to efficiently perform the official duties imposed upon him by law, and he may pay such person or persons reasonable compensation as may be agreed upon, provided such compensation shall not exceed the compensation usually paid for similar services by private employers of such persons. The compensation and necessary expenses of such employees shall be paid out of the attorney general’s contingent fund or out of funds especially appropriated for such purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3658; 1942, § 3829; Laws, 1930, ch. 154.

§ 7-5-11.
Statutory Advisor.

There is created the position of the Mississippi Statutory Advisor. The duties of the statutory advisor shall be to study, compare, and analyze the statute laws of this state and make report on his work to the Joint Committee on the Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, calling particular attention to errors, duplications, and conflicts found therein, along with recommendations for such corrections thereof as deemed advisable. It shall also be his duty to advise and consult with the joint committee and its counsel in regard to any of the statutes of this state and of the other states or any act of Congress, and on request of any member of the Legislature, he shall give written opinions in regard to the legality and effect of any such statute. Upon request, he shall advise and counsel with legislators in regard to the preparation of any proposed law or resolution for the consideration of the Legislature. At the request of any such member, he shall secure copies of any general law from the other states and give such legislator his opinion thereon and any other information in connection therewith that such legislator may desire in connection with his duties.

The statutory advisor shall be an assistant attorney general, appointed by the Attorney General, in addition to the assistant attorneys general authorized by law, in the same manner and under the same procedure as assistant attorneys general are appointed. His duties, in addition to the duties prescribed herein, shall be the same as that of assistant attorneys general, and his compensation shall be the same, and paid in like manner, as that of assistant attorneys general.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3828-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 264, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 200 (2d paragraph); Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 20; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 7-5-13.
Additional assistants to handle legal affairs of Highway Commission.

The attorney general may, with the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, appoint not more than two (2) competent attorneys, the number to be appointed to be fixed by the highway commission, each of whom shall be designated assistant attorney general, who shall be assigned specifically to the handling of the legal affairs of the state highway commission. Said assistants shall possess all of the qualifications required by law of the attorney general, shall have power and authority under the direction and supervision of the attorney general to perform all the duties required of that office, and shall be liable to all the pains and penalties to which the attorney general is liable. The attorney general may discharge any such assistant at his pleasure and appoint another in his stead. The attorney general shall fix the annual salary of each of the additional assistant attorneys general appointed under the provisions hereof at such sum as he may deem proper, not to exceed the maximum annual salary fixed by law for assistant attorneys general, said salary to be paid monthly from funds of the state highway commission. The assistant attorneys general shall devote their entire time and attention to the duties pertaining to the department of justice and the legal affairs of the state highway commission under the control and direction of the attorney general.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3827-11; Laws, 1966, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 7-5-15.
Secretaries.

The attorney general is authorized and empowered to employ such secretaries as he may deem necessary for the proper administration of the duties required of his office, and to fix their salaries in such amount as he may deem proper within funds appropriated for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3659; 1942, §§ 3827-02, 3830, 3830.5; Laws, 1930, ch. 154; Laws, 1948, ch. 220; Laws, 1952, ch. 179; Laws, 1958, ch. 290, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 487, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 7-5-17.
Office hours.

The attorney general shall be assigned an office at the capitol and shall keep the same open Monday through Friday for not less than eight hours each day. He and his assistants shall be there for business during said hours with the exception of such time when the attorney general or his assistants may be required to conduct the state’s business at other locations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 188; 1906, § 194; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3482; 1930, § 3660; 1942, § 3831; Laws, 1904, ch. 137; Laws, 1930, ch. 154; Laws, 1964, ch. 542, § 1, eff from and after ten days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 7-5-19.
Office space, supplies, and equipment.

In the event adequate office space for the use of the attorney general cannot be provided either in the state capitol building or the state office building to accommodate the additional authorized staff, the attorney general is hereby authorized to rent, on an annual or month-to-month basis on such terms as he may think proper, such office space as may be necessary in the city of Jackson to accommodate the additional enlarged staff, and to purchase such necessary office supplies and equipment as may be needed for the proper administration of said offices.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3827-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 487, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 7-5-21.
To keep a docket.

The Attorney General shall keep a docket of all causes in which he is required to appear, whether through his office or through outside counsel, which is a public record and must show the full style of the case, the cause number of the action, the county, district and court in which the causes have been instituted and tried, and whether the case is civil or criminal. If civil, the docket must show the nature of the demand, the stage of the proceedings, the name and address of any outside counsel, a description of the fee arrangement with any outside counsel, a memorandum of the judgment when prosecuted to judgment, any process issued thereon, whether satisfied or not, and if not satisfied, the return of the sheriff. If criminal, the docket must show the nature of the crime, the mode of prosecution, the stage of the proceedings, a memorandum of the sentence when prosecuted to a sentence, the execution thereof, if executed, and, if not executed, the reasons of delay or prevention.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 181; 1906, § 187; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3475; 1930, § 3661; 1942, § 3832; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-5-23.
To keep an opinion-book.

The attorney general shall keep an “opinion-book”, in which he shall record or cause to be recorded each and every opinion given by him, or by his assistants, in pursuance of law. Each of his opinions shall be prefaced with a clear and concise statement of the facts upon which it is predicated. The “opinion-book” shall be kept well indexed, both as to subject matters and parties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 182; 1906, § 188; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3476; 1930, § 3662; 1942, § 3833; Laws, 1886, p. 46.

§ 7-5-25.
To give opinions in writing.

The Attorney General shall give his opinion in writing, without fee, to the Legislature, or either house or any committee thereof, and to the Governor, the Secretary of State, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the State Treasurer, the Superintendent of Public Education, the Insurance Commissioner, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, the State Geologist, the State Librarian, the Director of Archives and History, the Adjutant General, the State Board of Health, the Commissioner of Corrections, the Public Service Commission, Chairman of the State Tax Commission, the State Forestry Commission, the Transportation Commission, and any other state officer, department or commission operating under the law, or which may be hereafter created; the trustees and heads of any state institution, the trustees and heads of the universities and the state colleges, the district attorneys, the boards of supervisors of the several counties, the sheriffs, the chancery clerks, the circuit clerks, the superintendents of education, the tax assessors, county surveyors, the county attorneys, the attorneys for the boards of supervisors, mayor or council or board of aldermen of any municipality of this state, and all other county officers (and no others), when requested in writing, upon any question of law relating to their respective offices.

When any officer, board, commission, department or person authorized by this section to require such written opinion of the Attorney General shall have done so and shall have stated all the facts to govern such opinion, and the Attorney General has prepared and delivered a legal opinion with reference thereto, there shall be no liability, civil or criminal, accruing to or against any such officer, board, commission, department or person who, in good faith, follows the direction of such opinion and acts in accordance therewith unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after a full hearing, shall judicially declare that such opinion is manifestly wrong and without any substantial support. However, if a court of competent jurisdiction makes such a judicial declaration about a written opinion of the Attorney General that applies to acts or omissions of any licensee to which Section 63-19-57, 75-67-137 or 75-67-245 applies, and the licensee has acted in conformity with that written opinion, the liability of the licensee shall be governed by Section 63-19-57, 75-67-137 or 75-67-245, as the case may be. No opinion shall be given or considered if the opinion is given after suit is filed or prosecution begun.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 183; 1906, § 189; Hemingway’s, 1917, § 3477; 1930, § 3663; 1942, § 3834; Laws, 1930, ch. 154; Laws, 1940, ch. 249; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 332, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 7-5-27.
To approve accounts against the state.

All accounts against the state subject to allowance by the supreme court shall be presented to the attorney general for approval. His opinion, or that of his assistant, concerning the validity of the same and whether it should be allowed or disallowed, shall be obtained in writing and presented to the court before the same shall be allowed by said court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 21, art. 3 (2); 1857, ch. 6, art. 69; 1871, § 165; 1880, § 254; 1892, § 191; 1906, § 197; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3485; 1930, § 3664; 1942, § 3835.

§ 7-5-29.
To attend the Supreme Court.

The attorney general shall attend the supreme court, in person or by his assistant, and prosecute and defend therein all causes to which the state or any officer thereof in his official capacity is a party, and all causes to which any county may be a party unless the interest of the county be adverse to the state, to some officer thereof acting in his official capacity, or to some other county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 21, art. 3 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art. 67; 1871, § 163; 1880, § 251; 1892, § 178; 1906, § 184; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3472; 1930, § 3665; 1942, § 3836.

§ 7-5-31.
Failure to attend Supreme Court.

Should the attorney general fail to attend, in person or by his assistant, any term of the supreme court, the court shall appoint some attorney to act for the state in place of the attorney general. The person so appointed shall receive such compensation as the court may allow, not exceeding one fourth of the annual salary of the attorney general, payable out of his salary; and, on production of the order of the court making said allowance, the auditor shall issue his warrant on the treasurer for the amount and shall charge the same to the account of the attorney general.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 21, art. 3(1); 1857, ch. 6, art. 67; 1871, § 163; 1880, § 251; 1892, § 189; 1906, § 195; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3483; 1930, § 3666; 1942, § 3837.

§ 7-5-33.
To enforce judgments and pay over collections.

After judgment in any cause represented by him, the attorney general shall direct the issuing of such process as may be necessary to carry the same into execution. He shall account for and pay over to the proper officer all moneys which may come into his possession belonging to the state or any subdivision thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 179; 1906, § 185; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3473; 1930, § 3667; 1942, § 3838.

§ 7-5-35.
May institute and prosecute suits to vacate fraudulent conveyances.

When it may be necessary or proper for the enforcement or collection of any judgment or debt in favor of the state, or any officer thereof in his official capacity, or of any county, the attorney general shall institute and prosecute in behalf of the creditor a suit or suits to set aside and annul any conveyance or other device fraudulently made by the debtor, or anyone for him, to hinder, delay, or defraud the creditor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 180; 1906, § 186; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3474; 1930, § 3668; 1942, § 3839.

§ 7-5-37.
To prosecute suits.

The attorney general shall, at the request of the governor or other state officer, in person or by his assistant, prosecute suit on any official bond, or any contract in which the state is interested, upon a breach thereof, and prosecute or defend for the state all actions, civil or criminal, relating to any matter connected with either of the state offices. He may require the service or assistance of any district attorney in and about such matters or suits.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 185; 1906, § 191; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3479; 1930, § 3669; 1942, § 3840.

§ 7-5-39.
To represent the state and state officers in suits; notice of civil legal action; retention of outside counsel under certain circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the Attorney General shall represent the state, in person or by his assistant, as counsel in all suits against the state in other courts or the Supreme Court at the seat of government, and he shall, in like manner, act as counsel for any of the state officers in suits brought by or against them in their official capacity, touching any official duty or trust.

No civil legal action on behalf of the state, any arm or agency of the state, or any statewide elected officer acting in his official capacity may be taken until seven (7) working days’ written notice of the proposed legal action is given to the statewide elected officer or proper person in charge of the arm or agency unless irreparable injury to the state would result by waiting for the expiration of the seven-day period.

The Attorney General shall authorize retention of independent counsel from outside his office by an arm or agency of the state or a statewide elected officer acting in his official capacity if the Attorney General declines representation when requested.

(i) The Attorney General shall authorize retention of independent counsel from outside his office by an arm or agency of the state or a statewide elected officer acting in his official capacity and shall withdraw from representation of the arm or agency of the state or the statewide elected officer if there is a significant disagreement with the Attorney General as to the legal strategy to be used in the matter, and the Outside Counsel Oversight Commission has first approved the retention of outside counsel.

If an arm or agency of the state or statewide elected officer acting in his official capacity retains outside counsel under this subsection (3), the counsel shall be selected by the arm or agency of the state or the statewide elected officer. Fees of counsel employed on a fee basis shall not exceed recognized bar rates for similar services; any contract for outside counsel employed on a contingency fee basis shall conform to the provisions of Section 7-5-8.

The Attorney General may pursue the collection of any claim or judgment in favor of the state outside of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 252; 1892, § 190; 1906, § 196; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3484; 1930, § 3670; 1942, § 3841; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-5-41.
To receive certified copies of pleadings.

In all suits against the state of Mississippi, any board, bureau, commission, or department thereof required to be defended by the attorney general, a completed copy of the bill of complaint, declaration, or other original pleading shall be mailed by the plaintiff or complainant to the attorney general, postage prepaid, properly addressed to him; and such original pleading shall bear a proper certificate to such effect when it is filed. No decree pro-confesso or default judgment shall be taken against such defendant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3841.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 313.

§ 7-5-43.
May advise public officials and employees investigated or sued as result of discharging duties.

In addition to all power and authority vested in the attorney general of the state of Mississippi by its constitution and statutes and all common law power and authority which may be invested in or exercised by such attorney general as such, the attorney general of the state of Mississippi and his assistants and representatives are hereby authorized upon request made of him to, in his discretion, render such services as the attorney general may deem necessary to assist in advising and in representing, either or both, all officers or employees of any county district, county, or municipality of the state of Mississippi, or of the state of Mississippi, or of any board, agency, or commission thereof, as the case may be, or any circuit clerk or county registrar, should they or any of them be investigated or called as a witness by the federal civil rights commission, be sued in an action at law or in equity, be prosecuted or cited to show cause or charged with contempt, civil or criminal, or proceeded against in any manner, either or all, in any state or federal court by the United States government, by any agency, officer, department, or representative of the United States government, or by any other person, either or all, as a result of the discharge by any of said Mississippi county district, county, municipal, or state of Mississippi officers or employees, boards, agencies, or commissions and the members thereof, or by the said circuit clerk or county registrar of their official duties under the constitution and other laws of the state of Mississippi, or growing out of such official action or nonaction, as the case may be.

The foregoing authority vested in the attorney general as above set out shall not apply to or with respect to any suit, action, hearing, or controversy which may arise between two (2) or more of the aforesaid officers or employees, circuit clerks or county registrars, such commissions, boards, or agencies or members thereof, or said county districts, counties, or municipalities of the state of Mississippi, or between them or by any of them and an agency or officer of the state of Mississippi which, under existing laws of the state of Mississippi, the attorney general is otherwise authorized or required to represent.

Any request made of the attorney general for the assistance above referred to shall be made in writing and, if by an individual, shall be signed by him or her. If by a board or commission or agency as such, there shall be entered upon its minutes an order making such request, and the request from and on behalf of said board, commission, or agency to the attorney general for said assistance shall be accompanied by a certified copy of said order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3841.2; Laws, 1958, ch. 257, §§ 1-3.

§ 7-5-45.
May advise school officials and employees in proceedings challenging validity of statute.

In addition to all power and authority vested in the attorney general of the state of Mississippi by its constitution and statutes and all common law power and authority which may be vested in or exercised by such attorney general as such, the attorney general of the state of Mississippi and his assistants and representatives are hereby authorized upon request made of him to, in his discretion, render such services as the attorney general may deem necessary to assist in advising and in representing, either or both, any officer or employee of any school district, any agricultural high school and junior college, or any institution of higher learning, the respective boards of trustees thereof, the members of said boards of trustees, any school district, junior college district, institution of higher learning, and any state officer, should they or any of them be sued, prosecuted, or proceeded against in any manner in any action in any state or federal court which, or the ultimate purpose of which, challenges or seeks to invalidate any statute or provision of the constitution of the state of Mississippi dealing with the establishment, maintenance, operation, control, financing, or determining what persons or pupils shall attend or be enrolled in any or all of said schools or colleges or institutions of higher learning, as violative of the constitution and laws of the United States of America or the state of Mississippi, or should such officers, employees, and members of such boards of trustees be investigated or called as a witness by the federal civil rights commission, cited to show cause, or charged with contempt, civil or criminal, by any officer, agent, department, or court of the United States government.

The foregoing authority vested in the attorney general as above set out shall not apply to or with respect to any suit, action, hearing, or controversy which may arise between two (2) or more of the aforesaid officers or employees, boards or members thereof, school districts, colleges or institutions of higher learning, or between them or any of them and an agency or officer of the state of Mississippi which, under existing laws of the state of Mississippi, the attorney general is otherwise authorized or required to represent.

Any request made of the attorney general for the assistance above referred to shall be made in writing and, if by an individual, shall be signed by him or her. If by a board as such, there shall be entered upon the minutes of such board an order making such request, and the request from or on behalf of said board to the attorney general for said assistance shall be accompanied by a certified copy of said order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3841.3; Laws, 1958, ch. 261, §§ 1-3.

§ 7-5-47.
Suits on bonds of state officers.

The attorney general or his assistant, when required by the governor, shall institute suits for the benefit of the state on the bond of any state officer in any case in which said officer has been guilty of any neglect or violation of his official duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 255; 1892, § 192; 1906, § 198; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3486; 1930, § 3671; 1942, § 3842.

§ 7-5-49.
To advise public service commission.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general to appear in person, or to designate one of his assistants to appear at each meeting of the public service commission and to assist and advise the said public service commission in all matters affecting its power and duties relative to the supervision of common carriers in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3487; 1930, § 3672; 1942, § 3843; Laws, 1910, ch. 172.

§ 7-5-51.
To represent state tax and public service commissions.

The attorney general, as well as the several district attorneys, is hereby authorized to institute or defend any suits arising out of any act or order of the tax commission or the public service commission affecting the laws and revenues of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921, Supp. § 3488a; 1930, § 3673; 1942, § 3844; Laws, 1918, ch. 238.

§ 7-5-53.
To assist district attorneys.

The Attorney General shall, when required by the public service or when directed by the Governor, in writing, repair in person, or by any regular or specially designated assistant, to any county or district in the state and assist the district attorney there in the discharge of his duties and in any prosecution against a state officer, and shall have the same right as the district attorney to enter the grand jury room while the grand jury is in session and to perform such services with reference to the work of the grand jury as the district attorney is authorized by law to perform.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 184; 1906, § 190; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3478; 1930, § 3674; 1942, § 3845; Laws, 1988, ch. 511, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.